Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Civil Service

Purpose of article

is to have police officers appointed according to merit and efficiency. Fristam v. Sheridan, 66 Wyo. 143, 206 P.2d 741,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1949).

Property interest in employment. —

A nonprobationary police officer whose employment relationship is governed by this article has a constitutionally protected property interest in her continued employment, and a 40-hour suspension without pay constitutes a deprivation of that protected property interest. Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

Civil service not under exclusive domain of municipal corporation.—

As the provisions of this article are uniformly applicable to all cities and towns, establishment of a civil service system for fire and police departments is not a local affair that a municipal corporation is “empowered to determine,” pursuant to art. 13, § 1, Wyo. Const.Police Protective Ass'n v. Rock Springs, 631 P.2d 433,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Civil Service §§ 1 to 90; 56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 110 and 114; 70 Am. Jur. 2d Sheriffs, Police and Constables § 10 et seq.

Power of civil service body on own motion and without notice or hearing to reconsider, modify, vacate or set aside order relating to dismissal of employee, 16 ALR2d 1126.

Assertion of immunity as ground for removing or discharging a public officer or employee, 44 ALR2d 789.

Validity, construction, and application of regulations regarding outside employment of governmental employees or officers, 62 ALR5th 671.

Sex discrimination in law enforcement and corrections employment, 53 ALR Fed 31.

Validity, under federal constitution, of regulations, rules or statutes requiring random or mass drug testing of public employees or persons whose employment is regulated by state, local or federal government, 86 ALR Fed 420.

§ 15-5-101.
“Commission” defined.

As used in this article, “commission” means the fire department civil service commission or the police department civil service commission.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 281; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-281; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cited in

Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 15-5-102.
Establishment of civil service commission or personnel system.

There is established a fire department civil service commission in each incorporated municipality maintaining a paid fire department and having a population of four thousand (4,000) or more.

The governing body in each incorporated municipality maintaining a paid police department and having a population of four thousand (4,000) or more which has not established a civil service commission may establish a police department personnel system in a manner as the governing body determines.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 282; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-282; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “according to the latest United States census” following “four thousand (4,000) or more” throughout the section.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Applied

in

Police Protective Ass'n v. City of Rock Springs, 631 P.2d 433,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1981).

Quoted

in

City of Rock Springs v. Police Protection Ass'n, 610 P.2d 975,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974); City Council v. Kreiling, 911 P.2d 1037,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-5-103.
Composition of civil service commission or personnel system; qualifications; terms; vacancies; oaths.

Each commission consists of three (3) members who shall be appointed by the mayor and confirmed by the governing body. Each commissioner shall be a qualified elector of the city and serve without compensation for a term of three (3) years and until his successor is appointed and qualified. Of the three (3) commissioners first appointed, one (1) shall be appointed for a one (1) year term, one (1) for a two (2) year term, and one (1) for a three (3) year term. Not more than one (1) commissioner may be appointed from the governing body, and no officer or employee in the fire or police department is eligible to appointment or service as a commissioner. In the case of a vacancy or disqualification of any commissioner, the mayor, with the consent of the governing body, may appoint a person to serve during the unexpired portion of the term and until a commissioner is appointed and qualified.

Before entering on the duties of their offices, all commissioners shall take and subscribe before the clerk of the municipality, an oath or affirmation that in no event will they appoint or remove any person because of his political opinions or for any reason other than the person’s fitness or unfitness. The oaths or affirmations shall be filed with the city clerk.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 283, 284; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-283, 15.1-284; W.S. 1977, §§

15-5-103

,

15-5-104

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Stated in

Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

Quoted

in

Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-5-104.
Civil service commission; offices; clerk; preliminary expenses.

The governing body shall furnish the commission’s necessary offices, office furniture, books, stationery, blanks, printing, heat, light and any other supplies. The city clerk is ex officio clerk of the commissions without extra compensation. Expenses incurred before the adoption of the next budget following the organization of any commission may be defrayed from any funds available or included in the next budget.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 285; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-285; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-105

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

§ 15-5-105.
Employment and appointments generally; appointment of chiefs.

Except as otherwise provided by law, no person may be employed or appointed in the fire or police department except from the list of eligible persons certified by the commissions to the governing body.

Appointment of a person to the office of chief of the fire department may be made from within or without the department and any appointment shall be based upon competitive examinations and merit. However, subject to equal qualifications, members of the department from the next lower grade shall be given preference for appointment to that office.

This section does not apply to the appointment, tenure or office of the chief of police. However, if any member of the police department is appointed chief of police, he shall remain on the list of eligible persons certified and his classification remains the same at the end of his term as chief of police.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 286; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-286; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-106

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1.

Stated in

Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied

in

Carlson v. Bratton, 681 P.2d 1333,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

City Council v. Kreiling, 911 P.2d 1037,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-5-106.
Commissions; classification of positions; working hours; salaries; exceptions; examinations.

The commissions shall classify the various positions in the departments into classes or schedules based upon the nature of the service to be rendered or duties to be performed. The governing body shall then establish uniform working hours and wages for all employees in each class or schedule and may regulate the rate of wages and the number of employees in any class or schedule as necessary. Notwithstanding any other general law fixing salaries or granting authority to fix salaries, the minimum salary for full-time policemen and full-time firemen in any city or town having a population of more than four thousand (4,000) is four hundred twenty-five dollars ($425.00) per month, with an increase of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month for each year of service rendered until a monthly salary of five hundred twenty-five dollars ($525.00) is reached. Any city or town may pay a salary in excess of five hundred twenty-five dollars ($525.00) per month. Persons holding positions of higher grade or rank in these departments shall be compensated in accordance with the responsibility of the position held, but shall receive a total salary of not less than six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600.00) per year.

The commission shall examine the qualifications of all applicants for eligible ratings in any class or schedule. The examinations shall be supervised by the commission and may be conducted by any member or a person designated by the commission. All examinations shall be impartial and relate only to matters which test the fitness of the persons examined to perform the services required in the class or schedule covered by the examination. The percentage of proficiency and rating based upon examination are those approved by the commission.

The salary provisions of this section do not apply to a special fireman or policeman temporarily employed, nor to firemen or policemen employed in a department having three (3) men or less.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 287, 329; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-287, 15.1-329; Laws 1967, ch. 18, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

15-5-107

,

15-5-301

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision prohibiting change of emoluments of officers during term, in cities of the first class, see §

15-3-213

.

As to salaries of firemen and policemen in cities operating under the city manager form of government, see §

15-4-202

.

As to deductions from salaries for firemen's pension fund, see §

15-5-203

.

As to deductions from salaries for policemen's pension fund, see §

15-5-302

.

For general state law as to wages, and as to minimum wages, see §§

27-4-101

to

27-4-204

.

For general state law as to hours of labor, see §§

27-5-101

and

27-5-102

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), in the third sentence, deleted “as determined by the last federal census” following “more than four thousand (4,000).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Section construed in relation to collective bargaining provisions. —

Construing this section in pari materia with §

27-10-101

et seq., it is clear that instead of fixing the maximum, the legislature has simply provided a formula through the medium of arbitration for fixing a specific amount above the minimum in the event the fire fighters exercise their statutory right of entering into a collective bargaining agreement with the city. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

City's mayor and/or single council member could not negotiate with a firefighters' union because the mayor and/or single council member were not “corporate authorities,” with wage setting authority, so city council was required to negotiate with the union. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).City Council v. Kreiling, 911 P.2d 1037,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutory classifications based on population, governmental employee salary or pension statutes, 96 ALR3d 538.

§ 15-5-107.
Employment and appointments generally; requirements; veterans; grading; reexamination.

Only those persons who are seventy-five percent (75%) or more proficient may be certified for employment. A local fire commission may establish a higher required proficiency, in which case only those persons meeting the higher standard shall be certified by the commission for employment. The examination requirements of this section shall not apply to a person meeting the conditions of W.S. 15-5-122(a) if the person is employed by a police department. The examination requirements of this section shall not apply to a person meeting the conditions of W.S. 15-5-122(a) if the person is employed by a fire department. All other things being equal, persons honorably discharged from the military service of the United States shall be given preference for employment over other candidates. Those examined shall be graded upon their examinations and their approved ratings or grades entered in a register. Eligible applicants for the fire department shall remain on the registers two (2) years, except the hiring authority of each department may choose the option of a one (1) year register. Applicants for the police department shall remain on the register one (1) year, without reexamination and certification. However, the commission, in its discretion, may require further examination as to physical fitness, health and age qualifications prior to certifying the applicant to the governing body for employment.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 288; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-288; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-108

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1983, ch. 134, § 1; 1985, ch. 209, § 1; 2003, ch. 45, § 2; 2005, ch. 123, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, removed the 33 years maximum age limitation from the first sentence, inserted the second sentence, deleted “age and” preceding “examination requirements” in the fourth sentence, and added the exception for fire department applicants in the seventh sentence.

Stated

in

Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-5-108.
Employment and appointments generally; manner of filling positions.

If a position is to be filled in either department, the governing body or chief of the department shall request from the commission the names of five (5) eligible persons. Upon request, the commission shall certify for departments the names of the five (5) qualified applicants having the highest percentage of proficiency, one (1) of whom shall be employed. If all persons certified are unsuitable for the position, the commission shall certify additional names, but the reason for certification of the additional names shall be stated in the certificate. If there are no registered, eligible applicants, the commission may allow provisional employment, or it may authorize the appointive authority to select a suitable person for examination, and if qualified, that person shall be certified for employment.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 289; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-289; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-109

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1983, ch. 134, § 1; 2005, ch. 123, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted the requirement that only three eligible persons be named as applicants for fire department employment.

Stated

in

Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996); Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 15-5-109.
Employment and appointments generally; trial period; eligibility for reemployment following force reduction.

The first year of employment of any person in a fire department is on a trial basis. A trial period of employment within a police department may be imposed as follows:

For introductory employees, a period of not more than the first eighteen (18) months of employment;

For employees promoted, a period of not less than twelve (12) months.

If the conduct of the introductory or promotional employee has been satisfactory during the trial period, he may be regularly employed or promoted, as applicable.

Employees discharged because of a reduction in force are eligible for reemployment within two (2) years following the date of their discharge without further examination.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 290; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-290; Laws 1975, ch. 37, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-110

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1983, ch. 134, § 1; 1995, ch. 187, § 1.

Quoted

in

Morgan v. City of Rawlins, 792 F.2d 975, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 25532 (10th Cir. 1986).

Stated

in

Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-5-110.
Filling officer vacancy.

If any vacancy occurs in the grade of officers, except the chief of a police department, it shall be filled by a competent person from the next lowest grade. The commission shall determine the competency of the person to fill the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 291; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-291; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-111

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Appointment of temporary police “commander” held nullity absentemergency. —

Where there is more than sufficient evidence that the appointment of a police “commander” was not made as a temporary appointment and that an emergency did not exist, the appointment is a nullity. City of Rock Springs v. Police Protection Ass'n, 610 P.2d 975,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 15-5-111.
Temporary service; emergency employees.

Employment for temporary service shall follow the same procedure as for permanent employees, except in case of emergency. No emergency employee may continue in service for more than ninety (90) days, and no reappointment or employment to the same position at the end of the period is allowed unless the emergency employee’s name is certified by the commission as provided in W.S.

15-5-108

. The official making an emergency employment shall report it to the commission within three (3) days, giving the reason and the probable period of emergency.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 292; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-292; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-112

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Appointment of temporary police “commander” held nullity absentemergency. —

Where there is more than sufficient evidence that the appointment of a police “commander” was not made as a temporary appointment and that an emergency did not exist, the appointment is a nullity. City of Rock Springs v. Police Protection Ass'n, 610 P.2d 975,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 15-5-112.
Retention of positions; discharge; grounds and procedure; retirement of firemen.

All persons occupying positions affected by this article may retain their positions until discharged or reduced in grade under its provisions.

Discharge from a department, or reduction in grade or compensation, or both, may be made for any cause, not political or religious, which will promote the efficiency of the service, on written notice and specifications filed with the commission and served upon the person affected by the authority requesting the discharge or reduction. The person whose discharge or reduction is sought is allowed a reasonable time to answer the charges in writing and demand a hearing. The commission, after hearing or investigation, shall determine whether the reason for discharge or reduction is sufficient and established. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section no person may be discharged or reduced in pay or rank without consent of the commission after a hearing, unless the action is pursuant to a classification program under W.S.

15-5-106

. A copy of the specifications, notice, answer, consent and order of discharge or reduction are a part of the public records of the commission.

In the case of a police department:

A chief of police or his representative, after written notice, may suspend any regular employee without pay for disciplinary purposes. The chief or his representative shall file with the commission, on or before the effective date of the suspension, a written statement of the causes for such action;

A chief of police or his acting chief may discharge or reduce in grade any employee if he considers that the good of the service will be served thereby. Any employee who is discharged or reduced in grade has the right to answer in writing the statement of the chief as to the cause for his discharge or reduction in grade, as the case may be, and to file this and any other affidavits and exhibits in support of his statement with the commission.

If any person in the fire department becomes sixty (60) years of age, the commission shall order that person retired from further service. However, if the person can pass annual mental and physical qualifications tests set by a physician chosen by the commission and governing body and given at no cost to the employee, he may be retained until he becomes sixty-five (65) years of age.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 293; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-293; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-113

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1983, ch. 134, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 301.

Cross references. —

As to meaning of “commission,” see §

15-5-101

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), inserted “or reduced in grade”; and in (b), substituted “reason for discharge or reduction” for “reason for discharge.”

Property interest in employment. —

A nonprobationary police officer whose employment relationship is governed by this article has a constitutionally protected property interest in her continued employment, and a 40-hour suspension without pay pursuant to subsection (c)(i) constitutes a deprivation of that protected property interest. Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

Commission must comply with administrative procedure provisions.—

A contention that the civil service commission is not required to comply with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act is without merit, the supreme court having held specifically not only that all agencies are within the act but also that they must file their rules with the secretary of state. Rolfes v. State, 464 P.2d 531,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1970).

“For cause” standard. —

The standards for suspending, discharging, or demoting an employee for “disciplinary purposes” pursuant to subsection (c)(i) or “the good of the service” pursuant to subsection (c)(ii) are the equivalent of standards for suspending, discharging, or demoting an employee “for cause,” and thus limit the public employer's exercise of discretion. Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

Implied contract properly stated. —

Fire department shift commander had stated a claim for damages where the record supported a finding that he had both an express and an implied employment contract with the city, and his allegation that the city had violated his Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-5-112

right to continued employment was enough to put the city on notice of the implied employment contract claim. Hanft v. City of Laramie, 2021 WY 52, 485 P.3d 369,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2021).

Due process. —

A police department employee who is suspended under subsection (c) for 40 hours without pay and who denies the charges made against her is entitled to not only a presuspension but also a postsuspension hearing under subsection (b), even though this exceeds the constitutional due process requirements. Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

Fire department captain’s date of termination was after a contested case hearing before the city civil service commission where her initial termination was rescinded and she was reinstated with back pay prior to a contested case hearing, at that hearing the commission determined whether she should be discharged, and based on the reinstatement letter and the contested case hearing, she had received notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard before her discharge. City of Rawlins v. Schofield, 2022 WY 103, 515 P.3d 1068,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2022).

Suspension without pay not reduction in pay. —

Action taken could not be construed to be a reduction in pay within the meaning of subsection (b), where police officer, for disciplinary purposes, was suspended for two days without pay and there was no showing that his pay scale was reduced or that pay was denied him for days actually worked. Bowen v. Sheridan, 459 P.2d 204,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1969).

Distinction between discharge and retirement is clearly established.

Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974).

Mandatory retirement provisions are nondiscriminatory

and involve a general age classification in the valid interests of the municipality and the state. Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974).

Whatever rights a city fireman who reached mandatory retirement age of 65 without having completed the number of years of service for a full pension had under the pension plan, such rights did not go so far as to deny the legislature the right to regulate the terms of the employment and by a nondiscriminatory enactment to place a time limit upon the right to continued employment. Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974).

Provisions say nothing about filing charges, giving notice, or conducting a hearing.

Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974).

And they do not contravene civil service requirements

that firemen can only be removed for cause and then only after following the requisite procedure of giving notice and holding a hearing. Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974).

Court may review disciplinary suspension where police department'scivil service commission grants hearing. —

The district court has jurisdiction to review the disciplinary suspension of a police officer where the rules and regulations of the police department's civil service commission provide that an officer may petition the commission for a hearing upon discharge, or reduction of classification or compensation, the commission grants a hearing to the officer as though he has been reduced in compensation, and the rules then provide that the contested-case proceedings of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act must be followed. Keslar v. Police Civil Serv. Comm'n, 665 P.2d 937,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

City of Casper v. Regan, 433 P.2d 834,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1967); City Council v. Kreiling, 911 P.2d 1037,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1996); Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

First Amendment protection for law enforcement employees subjected to discharge, transfer, or discipline because of speech, 109 ALR Fed 9.

§ 15-5-113.
Retention of positions; review of decisions.

The decision of the commission discharging or reducing any person in rank or pay may be reviewed by the district court pursuant to Rule 12 of the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 294; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-294; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-114

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Court may review disciplinary suspension where police department's civil service commission grants hearing. —

The district court has jurisdiction to review the disciplinary suspension of a police officer where the rules and regulations of the police department's civil service commission provide that an officer may petition the commission for a hearing upon discharge, or reduction of classification or compensation, the commission grants a hearing to the officer as though he has been reduced in compensation, and the rules then provide that the contested-case proceedings of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act must be followed. Keslar v. Police Civil Serv. Comm'n, 665 P.2d 937,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1983).

Scope of review under section should be limited

as provided in § 16-3-114(c). City of Casper v. Regan, 433 P.2d 834,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1967).

Jurisdiction for review of civil service commission decision.—

District court lacked subject matter jurisdiction to consider a city's petition for review of a civil service commission decision, which refused to consent to a firefighter's discharge, because the Wyoming Legislature did not grant cities the right to judicial review of commission decisions that refused to consent to employee discharges. Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

Police chief absolutely immune from damage suits arising out of testimony before commission. —

As a civil service commission hearing possesses characteristics of the judicial process, a chief of police was absolutely immune from suits for damages arising out of his testimony before the commission. Lentsch v. Marshall, 741 F.2d 301, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 19631 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

See “Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 65 (1954).

For note, “De Novo Judicial Review of Wyoming Administrative Findings,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 67 (1960).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes unfair labor practice under state public employee relations acts, 9 ALR4th 20.

Refusal to submit to polygraph examination as ground for discharge or suspension of public employees or officers, 15 ALR4th 1207.

§ 15-5-114.
Persons not eligible for appointment; criminal history record information.

No person may be appointed or employed as a regular policeman or officer of the police department or as a fireman or officer of a fire department who:

Has been convicted of, or against whom any indictment or information is pending for any offense, the punishment for which may be confinement in any penitentiary;

Is a notoriously bad character;

Is unable to read and write the English language; or

Lacks ordinary physical courage.

A fire department may, as a condition for a position with the department, require applicants to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 295; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-295; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-115

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2006, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

added (b).

Laws 2006, ch. 62, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

§ 15-5-115.
Order of lay off when force reduced; reemployment of firemen.

If the force or schedule of employees of a department is reduced, the person last certified for employment in the department or employed in the department in accordance with W.S.

15-5-122

shall be the first laid off. If more than one (1) person were employed in accordance with W.S.

15-5-122

simultaneously, and those persons were employed after the person last certified for employment, the person with the least seniority for his previous employing entity shall be the first laid off.

If a disabled, paid fireman, drawing a disability pension, becomes fit for active duty and his disability pension is discontinued within eighteen (18) months from the date of disability, he shall be returned to service in the department without any loss of rank, seniority or other privileges, provided he has not been discharged or reduced in grade for cause.

Former firemen who have been laid off within two (2) years because of reduction in force, and firemen who have been on a disability pension for more than eighteen (18) months but who have thereafter become fit for active duty, shall be given a priority, in the order of their original employment, upon application for any vacancy which cannot be filled by personnel then within the department, provided that the former firemen and formerly disabled firemen are then persons of good standing and qualified for the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 296; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-296; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-116

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2003, ch. 45, § 2.

§ 15-5-116.
Politically related activities prohibited.

No officer or employee of a department shall discharge or change the amount of compensation of any other officer or employee, or promise or threaten to do so, for giving, withholding or neglecting to make contributions or perform services for any political purpose, nor shall any officer or employee solicit political contributions from any civil service employee.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 297; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-297; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-117

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Stated in

Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees, 51 ALR4th 702.

§ 15-5-117.
Duties of commission; employee roster.

The commission shall keep at its office a roster showing the name, residence, position, date employed, compensation and duties of each person in the service. The commission has access to all public records and papers.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 298; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-298; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-118

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-5-118.
Duties of commission; employee certification.

The commission shall certify to the city clerk the names of employees in the service, stating in each case the character and date of commencement of service and any change in service. The governing body shall not allow a bill for service, nor shall the city clerk issue a warrant for the payment of any compensation to any person not so certified.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 299; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-299; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-119

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-5-119.
Duties of commission; rules; other powers.

The commission, together with a committee of three (3) designated by the mayor from the governing body shall adopt, and the commission shall enforce all rules and regulations necessary for the government of their proceedings. The commission shall:

Adopt rules for:

The classification of employment; and

Promotion on the basis of merit, experience and good record.

Prepare eligibility lists from which vacancies are to be filled;

Prescribe the procedure for the investigation of breaches of rules and regulations.

The commission may compel the attendance of witnesses and do all other things necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 300; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-300; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-120

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Stated in

Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).

Quoted

in

Mondt v. Cheyenne Police Dep't, 924 P.2d 70,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

City Council v. Kreiling, 911 P.2d 1037,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-5-120.
Prohibitions with respect to examinations.

No person shall willfully or corruptly, by himself or in cooperation with anyone else:

Defeat, deceive or obstruct any person in respect to his rights to examination;

Falsely mark, grade, estimate or report upon the examination or proper standing of any person examined, or aid in doing so;

Make any false representations concerning the examination or the person examined;

Furnish to any person any special or secret information for the purpose of improving or injuring the prospects or chances of any person examined or to be examined, appointed, employed or promoted.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 301; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-301; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-121

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-5-121.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 302; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-302; W.S. 1977, §

15-5-122

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

§ 15-5-122.
Fire and police services provided under cooperative agreements; exemption from civil service provisions; service credit.

The examination, preference and initial employment criteria of W.S.

15-5-105

through

15-5-108

shall not apply to a person employed in a fire or police department if:

The person was employed by a fire, emergency medical or police department of a county, special district, joint powers board or municipality not subject to this article;

The person becomes employed by a municipality subject to this article as a result of a contract or agreement between the municipality and the person’s previous employing entity to jointly provide fire, emergency medical services or police protection pursuant to W.S.

18-2-108

,

16-1-101

or the Wyoming Joint Powers Act; and

The new employing municipality agrees to apply the provisions of this section to the person.

A person meeting the conditions of subsection (a) of this section shall:

Be credited with his years of employment in his position for the previous employing entity for purposes of classification under this article, including, but not limited to, the provisions of W.S.

15-5-109

. Employment for the previous employing entity shall not be credited for purposes of W.S.

15-5-115

, except as between persons employed pursuant to this section simultaneously;

Not be considered to be employed in violation of the maximum age requirement for purposes of W.S. 15-5-204(d).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 45, § 1; 2005, ch. 123, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “age” preceding “preference.”

Wyoming Joint Powers Act. —

See §§

16-1-102

, 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Cited in

Vance v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 106, 382 P.3d 1104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2016).